Utah statutes.
19-6-308.   Hazardous Substances Mitigation Fund -- Prohibited uses.

The executive director may not use fund money to pay for:

(1)  property damage or bodily injury resulting from a hazardous material or substance release; or

(2)  property damage or bodily injury resulting from remedial studies or abatement action taken to address a hazardous material or substance release.

